Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7620
Recipients; reports.

The recipients of funds under the Native American Public Health Act shall submit a report on the activities funded each fiscal year. The report shall provide information as required by the Department of Health and Human Services to determine the effectiveness of the contract in meeting the goals of the Native American Public Health Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1070, § 16;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 60;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 683.